California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The owner or custodian of nursery stock which is held under a warning tag or notice shall, upon demand, have the right of a hearing before the director or the commissioner as to the justification of any such order, and may appeal to the director from any order of the commissioner which is made pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53424.

This article shall not be construed as limiting the right of the enforcement officer to proceed as authorized by other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53425.

Any decision of the director pursuant to this article is subject to review by any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Standards [53451. - 53452.]

53451.

Nursery stock which is sold shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) It shall be living stock and shall not be dead, or in a dying condition. 

(b) It shall not be seriously broken, frozen, or damaged.

(c) It shall not be abnormally potbound.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53452.

Deciduous fruit and nut trees which are sold shall be free from any of the following defects:

(a) Twisted, crossed, frosted, broken, or other defective roots.

(b) Broken grafts.

(c) Other deformations and defects which would interfere with the normal and proper development of such trees after planting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Labeling [53481. - 53484.]

53481.

When nursery stock is sold, it shall be labeled plainly and legibly as to the grade size, if so required by regulations, and as to the correct name as follows:

(a) The correct name for ornamentals, except roses, fruit trees, and annual or herbaceous perennial ornamental plants, shall be the botanical name.

(b) The correct name for fruit trees shall be the recognized common name and cultivar.

(c) The correct name for turf shall be the kind and cultivar.

(d) The correct name for roses, annual or herbaceous perennial ornamental plants, dormant bulbs, tubers, roots, corms, rhizomes, pips, and other kinds of nursery stock shall be the cultivar name, except that the recognized common name shall be required whenever no cultivar name has been given or can be determined.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

53482.

In order to identify nursery stock properly, whenever it is shipped, delivered, or transported to any purchaser, each plant shall be individually labeled as to the correct name. The director may create exceptions to this section by regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

53483.

Nursery stock on display for sale at retail may be labeled by a sign on any block of stock of the same kind and species. Turf shall be labeled by a sign showing the required correct name of the stock on display.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 622, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

53484.

This article shall become operative January 1, 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1202.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 7, commencing with Section 53481.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Violations [53511. - 53512.]

53511.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, ship, deliver, or transport to any purchaser any nursery stock which is within any of the following:

(a) Is not labeled in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the director.

(b) Has false or misleading labeling, or pertaining to which there has been a false or misleading advertisement.

(c) Is represented to be certified or registered nursery stock unless it has been produced and labeled in accordance with the procedures and in compliance with the rules and regulations of an official agency.

This section does not apply to any common carrier in respect to any nursery stock which is transported or delivered for transportation in the ordinary course of its business as a carrier.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53512.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Detach, alter, deface, or destroy any label, warning tag, or notice which is provided for in this chapter or in the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it, or alter or substitute nursery stock, in a manner that may defeat the purpose of this chapter.

(b) Disseminate any false or misleading advertisement concerning nursery stock in any manner or by any means.

(c) Hinder or obstruct in any way any authorized person in the performance of his duties under this chapter.

(d) Fail to comply with a warning tag or notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Penalties [53541. - 53541.]

53541.

The violation of any provision of this chapter is a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 122.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Abatement [53561. - 53564.]

53561.

Any lot of nursery stock which does not comply with the provisions of this chapter is a public nuisance and shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the director or the commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the nursery stock is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53562.

The district attorney of the county in which any such nuisance is found, at the request of the director or the commissioner, shall maintain, in the name of the people of the State of California, a civil action to abate and prevent such nuisance. Upon judgment and by order of the court, such nuisance shall be condemned and destroyed in the manner directed by the court, or relabeled, or reconditioned, or released upon such conditions as the court in its discretion may impose to insure the nuisance will be abated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

53563.

If the owner fails to comply with the order of the court within the time specified in the order, the court may order that such nursery stock be forthwith destroyed or the nuisance otherwise abated as set forth in such order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

53564.

A proceeding pursuant to this article if the value of the property is thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less is a limited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 13.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. PROCESSORS, STORERS, DEALERS, AND DISTRIBUTORS OF AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS [54001. - 57700.]



CHAPTER 1. Nonprofit Cooperative Associations [54001. - 54294.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [54001. - 54004.]

54001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54002.

“Association” means any corporation which is organized pursuant to this chapter. An association shall be deemed incorporated pursuant to this chapter, or organized pursuant to this chapter and shall be deemed a producer of a product within the meaning of this chapter, if it is functioning under, or is subject to, the provisions of this chapter, irrespective of whether it was originally incorporated pursuant to such provisions or was incorporated under other provisions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54003.

“Member” includes members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations which are organized with shares of stock.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54004.

“Product” includes any horticultural, viticultural, aquacultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, or farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [54031. - 54042.]

54031.

The purpose of this chapter is to do all of the following:

(a) Promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of agricultural products through cooperation.

(b) Eliminate speculation and waste.

(c) Make the distribution of agricultural products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done.

(d) Stabilize the marketing of agricultural products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54032.

The following are all here recognized:

(a) Agriculture is characterized by individual production in contrast to the group or factory system that characterizes other forms of individual production. 

(b) The ordinary form of corporate organization permits industrial groups to combine for the purpose of group production and the ensuing group marketing, and the public has an interest in permitting farmers to bring their industry to the high degree of efficiency and merchandising skill evidenced in the manufacturing industries.

(c) The public interest urgently needs to prevent the migration from the farm to the city in order to keep up farm production and to preserve the agricultural supply of the nation.

(d) The public interest demands that the farmer be encouraged to attain a superior and more direct system of marketing in the substitution of merchandising for the blind, unscientific, and speculative selling of crops.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54033.

Associations which are organized pursuant to this chapter are “nonprofit,” since they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54034.

Any provisions of law which are in conflict with this chapter do not apply to any association which is provided for in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54035.

Any exemption under any existing law which applies to any agricultural product in the possession, or under the control, of the individual producer, shall apply similarly and completely to such product which is delivered by its farmer members that are in the possession, or under the control, of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54036.

A person, firm, corporation, or association, that is hereafter organized or doing business in this state, may not use the word “cooperative” as part of its corporate name or other business name or title for producers’ cooperative marketing activities, unless it has complied with this chapter or is otherwise authorized by Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 26220) of Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 111.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

54037.

Any corporation or association which is organized pursuant to previously existing statutes for the purpose of cooperatively marketing products as defined in this chapter or under Title 23 (commencing with Section 653aa), Part 4, Division 1 of the Civil Code shall be deemed to be organized and existing pursuant to, and by virtue of, this chapter, and all of the provisions of this chapter, and any of the restrictions and benefits of such provisions, shall apply to such corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54038.

Any association which is organized pursuant to this chapter is not any of the following:

(a) A conspiracy, a combination in restraint of trade, or an illegal monopoly. 

(b) An attempt to lessen competition, to fix prices arbitrarily, or to create a combination or pool in violation of any law of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54039.

The marketing contracts and agreements between an association which is organized pursuant to this chapter and its members and any agreements authorized in this chapter are not illegal, in restraint of trade, or contrary to any statute which is enacted against pooling or combinations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54040.

The General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) as added by Chapter 682 of the Statutes of 1975 and as heretofore or hereinafter amended and all powers and rights under such law applies to each association which is organized pursuant to this chapter, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter. For the purpose of associations organized without shares of stock, the members shall be deemed to be “shareholders” as the term is used in the General Corporation Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

54041.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply to any proprietary interest in an association organized in accordance with this chapter. Any proprietary interest that would otherwise escheat to the state pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall instead become the property of the association.

(b) This section shall apply to all proprietary interests which as of January 1, 1988, have not yet been paid or delivered to the Controller pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no proprietary interest shall become the property of the association under this section unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) At least 60 days prior notice of the proposed transfer of the proprietary interest to the association is given to the affected member by first-class or certified mail to the last address of the member shown on the association’s records, and by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the member last resided as shown on the association’s records. Notice given in that manner constitutes actual notice.

(2) No written notice objecting to the transfer is received by the association from the affected member or, if the member is deceased, from the member’s heirs or the executor or executrix of the estate, prior to the date of the proposed transfer.

(d) “Proprietary interest” means and includes any membership, membership certificate, membership share, share certificate, or equity or dividend certificate of any class representing a proprietary interest in, and issued by, the association together with all accrued and unpaid earnings, dividends, and patronage distributions relating thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 152, Sec. 2.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

54042.

(a) An association organized pursuant to this chapter may request the board of supervisors of the county in which the association’s principal place of business is located to issue a certificate stating that the association meets the requirements of subdivision (b). When the certificate is provided by the board of supervisors to the association, the Franchise Tax Board shall exempt the association from the minimum franchise tax as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 23153 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The board of supervisors shall issue a certificate if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The association is located in an economically distressed area.

(2) At least 90 percent of the association’s members are, or have been, within the previous 12 months unemployed or dependent on public social services for their income.

(3) The request is made during the association’s first income year.

(c) The certificate issued by the board of supervisors shall be retained by the association. The association shall forward a copy of the certificate to the Franchise Tax Board upon request.

(d) As used in this section, “economically distressed area” means a county in which the unemployment rate is either 9 percent, or 2 percent above the statewide average, whichever is greater; or in which 8 percent of the residents are dependent on public social services for their income, or 2 percent more of the residents than the statewide average are dependent on public social services for their income, whichever is greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   Effective September 7, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purposes [54061. - 54061.]

54061.

Three or more natural persons, a majority of whom are residents of this state, who are engaged in the production of any product, may form an association pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of engaging in any activity in connection with any of the following:

(a) The production, marketing, or selling of the products of its members.

(b) The harvesting, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, shipping, or utilization of any product of its members, or the manufacturing or making of the byproducts of any product of its members.

(c) The manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members of machinery, equipment or supplies.

(d) The financing of the activities which are specified by this section.

(e) Any one or more of the activities which are specified in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Articles of Incorporation [54081. - 54083.]

54081.

The articles of incorporation of the association shall show that the signers of the articles of incorporation are engaged in the production of products, and that they propose to incorporate an association pursuant to this chapter, and shall state all of the following:

(a) The name of the association.

(b) The purposes for which it is formed.

(c) The county where the principal office for the transaction of business of the association is to be located.

(d) The number of directors of the association, which shall not be less than three, and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as first directors. If it is desired that the first directors shall serve for terms of different length, the term for which each person so named shall serve shall also be stated.

(e) If organized without shares of stock, whether the voting power and the property rights and interest of each member are equal or unequal. If voting power and property rights and interest of each member are unequal, the general rule or rules which are applicable to all members by which the voting power and the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may be and are determined and fixed shall also be stated.

(f) If organized with shares of stock, the number of shares which may be issued and if the shares are to have a par value, the par value of each share, and the aggregate par value of all shares. If the shares are to be without par value it shall be so stated.

If the shares of stock are to be classified, a description of the classes of shares and a statement of the number of shares of each kind or class and the nature and extent of the preferences, rights, privileges, and restrictions which are granted to or imposed upon the holders of the respective classes of stock.

Except as to the matters and things so stated, no distinction shall exist between the classes of stock or the holders of them. One class of stock shall always be known as common stock and voting power may be restricted to holders of common stock.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54082.

Articles of incorporation shall be signed, acknowledged, and filed in the manner which is prescribed by the general laws of this state for domestic corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54083.

The articles of incorporation of any association may be amended in the manner and for the purposes which are authorized by the General Corporation Law, Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [54111. - 54122.]

54111.

Each association shall, within 30 days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of bylaws, not inconsistent with this chapter. The vote or written assent of shareholders or members that hold at least a majority of the voting power is necessary to adopt such bylaws and is effectual to repeal or amend any bylaws, or to adopt additional bylaws.

The power to repeal and amend the bylaws, and adopt new bylaws, may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be delegated to the board of directors, which authority may, by a similar vote, or similar written assent, be revoked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54112.

The bylaws may prescribe the time, place, and manner of calling and conducting its meetings. Meetings of members or stockholders shall be held at the place as provided in the bylaws; and if no provision be made, then in the city where the principal place of business is located at a place designated by the board of directors. Meetings of the board of directors may be held at any place within or without the state which is fixed by a quorum of the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54113.

The bylaws may prescribe the number of stockholders or members which constitutes a quorum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54114.

The bylaws may prescribe the right of members or stockholders to vote by proxy or by mail or both, and the conditions, manner, form, and effects of such votes; the right of members or stockholders to cumulate their votes and the prohibition, if desired, of cumulative voting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54115.

The bylaws may prescribe the number of directors which constitutes a quorum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54116.

(a) The bylaws may prescribe the qualifications, compensation, duties, and term of office of directors and officers and the time of their election.

(b) The number of directors set forth in the articles of incorporation shall be either a fixed number or a variable number. If a fixed number, it shall not be less than three, and if a variable number, the stated minimum shall not be less than three and the stated maximum shall not be greater than two times the stated minimum minus one.

(c) The number of directors may also be set forth in the bylaws either as a fixed number or as a variable number subject to the same limitations as in subdivision (b). After shares have been issued or members have been admitted, any adoption or amendment of such bylaw provision shall be approved by the outstanding shares as provided in Section 152 of the Corporations Code.

(d) In the event of an inconsistency between an article provision referred to in subdivision (b) and a bylaw provision referred to in subdivision (c), the provision more recently adopted or amended shall prevail.

(e) If a variable number of directors is set forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the exact number of directors shall be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board of directors or the shareholders as provided in Section 153 of the Corporations Code in the manner designated in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

54117.

The bylaws may prescribe penalties for violations of the bylaws.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54118.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of such fees; and the purposes for which they may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54119.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount which each member or stockholder shall be required to pay annually, or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services which are rendered by the association to him and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing contract between the association and its members or stockholders which every member or stockholder may be required to sign.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54120.

The bylaws may prescribe the amount of any dividends that may be declared on the stock or membership capital. To the extent that dividends are payable out of the excess of association income over association expenses attributable to business transacted with or for members, dividends shall not exceed 8 percent per annum. Dividends are in the nature of interest, and do not affect the nonprofit character of any association that is organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

54121.

The bylaws may prescribe the number and qualification of members or stockholders of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common stock; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw or the holders of common stock to transfer their stock; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members, and of the shares of common stock; the conditions upon which, and time when, membership of any member shall cease; the automatic supsension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; and the mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54122.

The bylaws may prescribe the manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of his membership, or at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors; and the conditions and terms for the repurchase by the association from its stockholders of their stock upon their disqualification as stockholders. In case of the expulsion of a member, and where the bylaws do not provide any procedure or penalty, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise his property interest in the association and shall fix the amount of his property interest in money, which shall be paid to him within one year after such expulsion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Directors and Management [54141. - 54150.]

54141.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than three directors who are elected by the members or stockholders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54142.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that directors shall be elected from the several districts. In any such case, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54143.

The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held to nominate directors. If the bylaws provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, the bylaws may also provide that the results of the primary elections in the various districts shall be final and shall be ratified at the annual meeting of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54144.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, and that the directors shall be elected by representatives or advisers, who themselves have been elected by the members or stockholders from the several territorial districts. In any such case, the bylaws shall specify the number of representatives or advisers to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the representatives or advisers and of redistricting the territory which is covered by the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54145.

The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be chosen by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members. Such director shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The directors so chosen shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one-fifth of the entire number of directors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54146.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54147.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time which is actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

(History: Enacted by stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54148.

If a vacancy on the board of directors occurs except by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy unless the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts. If the bylaws provide for an election of directors by districts, the vacancy shall be filled by the election of a director from the district in which the vacancy occurs or the board of directors may call a special meeting of the members or stockholders in that district to fill the vacancy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54149.

The directors shall elect a president, one or more vice presidents, a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as may be prescribed by the bylaws. Any two or more offices, except those of president and secretary, may be held by the same person.

The treasurer may be a bank or any depository and as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

54150.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition which is signed by five percent of the members, which requests the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The director or officer, against whom such charges have been brought, shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses. The person bringing the charges against him shall have the same opportunity.

If the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, the petition for removal of a director shall be signed by 20 percent of the members that reside in the district from which such director was elected. The board of directors shall call a special meeting of the members that reside in that district to consider the removal of the director; and by a vote of the majority of the members of that district, the director in question shall be removed from office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers [54171. - 54182.]

54171.

An association may engage in any activity in connection with the marketing, selling, preserving, harvesting, drying, processing, manufacturing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, or utilization of any product which is produced or delivered to it by its members; or the manufacturing or marketing of the byproducts of any such product; or any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment, or in the financing of any such activities; or in any one or more of the activities which are specified in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54172.

An association may borrow without limitation as to amount of corporate indebtedness or liability and may make advances to members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54173.

An association may act as the agent or representative of any member or members in any of the activites which are mentioned in Section 54171 or 54172.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54174.

An association may purchase or otherwise acquire, hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, sell, transfer, pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association which is engaged in any related activity or in the warehousing, handling, marketing, packing, manufacturing, processing, or preparing for market of any product which is handled by the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54175.

An association may establish reserves and invest the funds of the reserves in bonds or in such other property as may be provided in the bylaws.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54176.

An association may buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership, over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of, or incidental to, any of the business of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54177.

An association may levy assessments in the manner and in the amount as may be provided in its bylaws.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54178.

An association may do each and every thing which is necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of any one of the purposes, or the attainment of any one or more of the objects, which are enumerated in this article; or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association; and contract accordingly; exercise and possess all powers, rights, and privileges which are necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and, in addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges which are granted by the laws of this state to ordinary corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter; and do any such thing anywhere.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54179.

An association may use or employ any of its facilities for any purpose, provided the proceeds which arise from such use and employment shall go to reduce the cost of operation for its members. The products which are handled for, or the services, machinery, equipment, or supplies or facilities which are furnished to, nonmembers shall not, however, exceed in value the products which are handled for, or the services, merchandise, or facilities which are supplied to, members during the same period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54180.

An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other corporation, with or without capital stock, which is engaged in preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, storing, handling, shipping, utilizing, manufacturing, marketing, or selling of any product which is handled by the association, or the byproducts of any such product.

If such corporations are warehousing corporations, they may issue legal warehouse receipts to the association against the commodities which are delivered by it, or to any other person and such legal warehouse receipts shall be considered as adequate collateral to the extent of the usual and current value of the commodity which they represent. If such warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded pursuant to the laws of this state or the United States, its warehouse receipt which is delivered to the association on any commodity of the association or its members, or delivered by the association or its members, shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the association.

Any two or more corporations which are organized pursuant to this section may be merged into one such constituent corporation or consolidated into a new corporation, such merger or consolidation to be made in the manner that is prescribed by the general laws of the state which cover domestic corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

54181.
